Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 142C-6 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Upon the request of a sexual assault victim, the
investigating law enforcement agency shall inform the victim of the
status of the sexual assault forensic evidence from the criminal
case of the victim. The law enforcement agency may, at its
discretion, require that the request by the victim be in writing.
The provisions of this subsection shall not require a law
enforcement agency to communicate with the victim or the advocate of
the victim regarding the status of forensic testing absent a
specific request from the victim or advocate of the victim.

B. Sexual assault victims have the right to be informed of the
following:
1. Whether or not a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) profile was
obtained from the testing of the sexual assault forensic evidence
from the criminal case of the victim;
2. Whether or not the DNA profile developed from the sexual
assault forensic evidence has been entered into the Combined DNA
Index System (CODIS) Database; and
3. Whether or not there is a confirmed match between the DNA
profile developed from the sexual assault evidence and a DNA profile
contained in the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) Database.
C. This section is intended to encourage law enforcement
agencies to notify victims of information that is in the possession
of the law enforcement agencies.
D. This section shall not require the disclosure of evidence,
information, or results which would impede or compromise an ongoing
criminal investigation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2705 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2705 Page 3